Louisiana, session 2026, SB168.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:3386.1, 3386.2(A), the introductory paragraph of 3386.2(B),
3388.3, and 3390.6(B)(6) through (8) and R.S. 40:1203.3(E)(3)(b) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 37:3386.2(B)(7), 3387.15, 3387.16, 3387.17, 3388.4, 3388.5, and
3390.6(B)(9) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3386.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meaning ascribed to
them in this Section:
Page 1 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
(1) "Addiction counselor" means any person who is licensed, certified, or
registered in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and procedures
established by the board and who, by means of his special knowledge acquired
through formal education or practical experience, is qualified to provide addiction
counseling services to those individuals afflicted with or suffering from an addictive
disorder or certain co-occurring disorders. The counseling services provided shall be
those which utilize KSA or core functions, as determined by the board to be
appropriate for the addictive disorder or disorders presented.
(2) "Addictive disorder" means the repeated pathological use of substances
including but not limited to alcohol, drugs, or tobacco, or repeated pathological
compulsive behaviors including but not limited to gambling, which cause physical,
psychological, emotional, economic, legal, social, or other harms to the individual
afflicted with the addiction or to others affected by the individual's affliction. As
used in this Chapter, "addictive disorder" shall include not only those instances
where withdrawal from or tolerance to the substance or behaviors are present but
also those instances involving use and abuse of substances.
(3) "Behavioral health condition" means a condition that affects an
individual's emotional, psychological, cognitive, behavioral, or social
functioning and may impact their ability to pursue health, wellness, recovery,
and quality of life, and includes substance use-related conditions, mental health
conditions, co-occurring conditions, trauma-related impacts, and patterns of
behavior that create functional impairment, distress, or increased risk of harm
to the individual or others.
(3)(4) "Board" means the governing body of the Addictive Disorder
Regulatory Authority.
(4)(5) "Certified clinical supervisor" means any person holding the necessary
credential of licensed, certified, or registered addiction counselor or any person who
holds a specialty substance abuse credential in another professional discipline in a
human services field at the master's level or higher; and who has satisfied the
Page 2 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
requirements established by the board to provide clinical supervision.
(5)(6) "Client" means the individual, couple, family, group, organization, or
community that seeks or receives addiction counseling services from the addiction
professional or an addiction facility until discharged.
(6)(7) "Clinical supervision" means the interpersonal tutorial relationship
between a certified clinical supervisor and other licensed, certified, or registered
addiction counseling professionals centered on the goals of skill development and
professional growth through learning and practicing. Through observation,
evaluation, and feedback, clinical supervision enables the supervisee to acquire the
competence needed to deliver effective patient care while fulfilling professional
responsibility. Clinical supervision is understood to emphasize improvement of the
counseling skills and effectiveness of the supervisee and is to be distinguished from
administrative supervision.
(7)(8) "Compulsive gambling counselor" means any person holding a
necessary credential as a licensed, certified, or registered addiction counselor, or a
necessary credential as a qualified mental health professional, who is certified by the
board, in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, as possessing special
knowledge acquired through formal education and clinical experience and thus is
qualified to provide gambling addiction counseling to persons who have a gambling
addiction disorder or who exhibit gambling addictive behaviors.
(8)(9) "Co-occurring disorder" means a disorder in which an individual has
at least one psychiatric disorder as well as an addictive disorder. While these
disorders may interact differently in any one person, at least one disorder of each
type can be diagnosed independently of the other.
(9)(10) "Core functions" means the screening, intake, orientation, assessment,
treatment planning, counseling, case management, crisis intervention, client
education, referral, reports, and record-keeping activities associated with counseling
and consultation with other credentialed professionals.
(10)(11) "Counselor-in-training" means any person who has not yet met the
Page 3 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
qualification to become a licensed, certified, or registered counselor, but who has
made application to the board in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and
procedures established by the board.
(11)(12) "Custodial environment" means a setting created by a court system
in which a person has been deprived of freedom of action in any significant way.
(12)(13) "KSA" means the knowledge, skills, and attitudes designated by the
board as being necessary for effective addiction counseling and required by the board
to be utilized by addictive disorders counselors in providing addiction counseling
services.
(14) "Licensed mental health professional" means an individual who is
currently licensed and in good standing in the state of Louisiana to practice
within the scope of all applicable state laws, practice acts, and the individual's
professional license, as one of the following:
(a) Medical psychologist.
(b) Licensed psychologist.
(c) Licensed clinical social worker.
(d) Licensed professional counselor.
(e) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(f) Licensed addiction counselor.
(g) Advanced practice registered nurse.
(h) Licensed rehabilitation counselor.
(15) "Peer support" means nonclinical, strengths-based activities and
services provided by an individual in recovery from a behavioral health
condition to a person experiencing a behavioral health condition. Such services
are grounded in lived experience and include mentoring, guiding, and
supporting individuals in the identification and implementation of recovery
strategies through relationship-based support. Peer support utilizes shared
experience to provide empathy, practical guidance, encouragement, and hope,
and may include assistance with self-advocacy, goal setting, and engagement
Page 4 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
with treatment and community-based recovery supports. Peer support services
complement but do not replace clinical treatment and shall not include
diagnosis, clinical assessment, psychotherapy, or any service requiring
professional licensure.
(16) "Peer support specialist" means any person who is credentialed in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and procedures established by
the board and who, by means of his special knowledge acquired through formal
education and lived experience, is qualified to provide behavioral health
services to those individuals afflicted with or suffering from a behavioral health
condition. The services provided shall be those which utilize support services or
core functions, as determined by the board.
(17) "Peer support specialist associate" means any person who has not
yet met the qualifications to become a peer support specialist, but who has made
application to the board in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and
procedures established by the board.
(18) "Peer support specialist supervisor" means any person holding the
necessary credential of peer support specialist, licensed mental health
professional, certified, or registered addiction counselor and who has satisfied
the requirements established by the board to provide peer supervision.
(13)(19) "Prevention" means those activities and services that prevent,
reduce, or stabilize the incidence of addictive disorders and thereby prevent, reduce,
or stabilize the prevalence of addictive disorders. The activities contemplated by this
definition include services to those at risk of developing an addictive disorder as well
as those individuals who, though not necessarily at risk of developing an addictive
disorder, are nonetheless appropriate for services. In addition, prevention shall be
understood to include educational programs and activities that are designed to raise
the awareness of and encourage healthy behaviors.
(14)(20) "Prevention specialist-in-training" means any person who has not
yet met the qualifications to become a licensed, certified, or registered prevention
Page 5 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
professional, but who has made application to the board in accordance with the
provisions of this Chapter and procedures established by the board.
(15)(21) "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A psychiatrist licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:1261 et seq.
(b) A psychologist licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:2351 et seq., or a medical
psychologist licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:1360.51 et seq.
(c) A licensed clinical social worker licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:2701 et seq.
(d) A mental health counselor licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:1101 et seq.
(16)(22) "Substance abuse use disorder" means the repeated pathological use
of drugs, including alcohol, which causes physical, psychological, economic, legal,
or social harm to the individual user or to others affected by the user's behavior.
§3386.2. Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority
A.(1) The legislature hereby finds it appropriate that the responsibility and
authority to regulate the practice of addictive disorder treatment and prevention be
exercised by a licensing board created for that purpose.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that there be a single authority
issuing credentials for substance use disorder counseling, prevention, and peer
support professionals in Louisiana. The authority for issuing and recognizing
credentials for professionals engaged in the providing of substance use disorder
counseling, prevention, and peer support services for those who suffer from
behavioral health conditions shall be the Addictive Disorder Regulatory
Authority.
B. The Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority (ADRA) is hereby created
within the Louisiana Department of Health. The ADRA shall be governed by a board
of directors, referred to hereafter in this Chapter as the "board", consisting of eight
nine voting members, all of whom shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
Senate confirmation, as follows:
* * *
(7) One member who represents the Louisiana Department of Health,
Page 6 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
office of behavioral health.
* * *
§3387.15. Peer support specialist; scope of practice
A.(1) The practice of peer support within the meaning and intent of this
Chapter shall consist of the rendering of mentorship, guidance, and support
services to individuals suffering from a behavioral health condition to assist
them in gaining an understanding of the nature of their disorder and developing
and maintaining a responsible lifestyle.
(2) The peer support specialist may practice autonomously, independent
of any other professional association or supervision. The peer support specialist
cannot render clinical services.
(3) The scope of practice, in addition to any other applicable provision
of this Chapter, shall include implementing strategic support, providing
mentorship to family members, and, as appropriate, to others affected by the
individual's behavioral health condition, and the utilization of KSA and core
functions.
B. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules which govern peer
support specialists in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
C. Any person seeking to be recognized by the board as a peer support
specialist shall submit an application on a form and in a manner prescribed by
the board. The initial application form shall be accompanied by an initial
application fee as provided for in this Chapter.
D. Upon investigation of the application, the board shall, within thirty
days, notify each candidate that the application is satisfactory and accepted or
unsatisfactory and rejected. If an application is rejected, the notice shall state
the reason for such rejection.
E. The board shall recognize, as a peer support specialist, each candidate
who:
(1) Is a legal resident of the United States and at least eighteen years of
Page 7 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
age on the date the application is received.
(2) Is not in violation of any ethical standards subscribed to by the board.
(3) If the applicant has lived experience with addiction, mental illness,
or co-occurring disorders, the applicant shall demonstrate at least twelve
months of stability and not be currently engaged in acute treatment at the time
the application is received.
(4) Has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo
contendere to, a felony. However, the board may, in its discretion, waive this
requirement upon review of the individual's circumstances. Each candidate
shall sign a form prescribed by the board authorizing the board to obtain a
criminal history or to conduct a criminal background check.
(5) Signs a form of professional and ethical accountability and
responsibility as prescribed by the board.
(6) Demonstrates professional competence by passing a written
examination.
(a) The board shall determine the scope and administration of the
examination.
(b) The board may provide for circumstances under which a candidate
who fails the examination, but who meets all other requirements, may retake
the examination.
(c) The board shall make reasonable accommodations for those
candidates who demonstrate a special need or disability.
(7) Documents the completion of education specific to the KSA peer
support standards and core functions.
(8) Documents the completion of supervision specific to the KSA peer
support standards and core functions under conditions as shall be determined
by the board. The board may require that such supervision be conducted by an
organization's documented and qualified supervisory staff per job description.
F. The board may prescribe such other qualifications and requirements
Page 8 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
for peer support specialists as may be appropriate for the protection of the
public or the enhancement of professional services provided pursuant to the
authority of this Chapter.
§3387.16. Peer support specialist associate; scope of practice
A. The practice of peer support within the meaning and intent of this
Chapter shall consist of the rendering of mentorship, guidance, and support
services to individuals suffering from a behavioral health condition to assist
them in gaining an understanding of the nature of their disorder and developing
and maintaining a responsible lifestyle.
B.(1) The status of peer support specialist associate is intended to assist
professional development by providing qualified individuals with supervised
professional experience.
(2) The status of peer support specialist associate is, by its very nature,
temporary and it is anticipated that the individual will progress through the
experience to become a peer support specialist or supervisor.
(3) The peer support specialist associate may not practice independently
and cannot render clinical services.
(4) The peer support specialist associate may work only under the direct
supervision of a peer support specialist, peer support supervisor, licensed
mental health provider, certified addiction counselor, or registered addiction
counselor.
(5) The scope of practice, in addition to any other applicable provision
of this Chapter, shall include implementing directly-supervised strategic
support, providing directly-supervised mentorship to family members, and, as
appropriate, to others affected by the individual's behavioral health condition,
and the utilization of KSA and core functions.
C. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules which govern the status
of peer support specialist associate in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter.
Page 9 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
D. Any person seeking to be recognized by the board as a peer support
specialist associate shall submit an application to the board on a form and in a
manner as the board shall prescribe. The initial application form shall be
accompanied by an initial application fee as provided for in this Chapter.
E. Upon investigation of the application, the board shall, within thirty
days, notify each candidate that the application is satisfactory and accepted or
unsatisfactory and rejected. If an application is rejected, the notice shall state
the reason for such rejection.
F. The board shall recognize, as a peer support specialist associate, each
candidate who:
(1) Is a legal resident of the United States and at least eighteen years of
age on the date the application is received.
(2) Is not in violation of any ethical standards subscribed to by the board.
(3) If the applicant has lived experience with addiction, mental illness,
or co-occurring disorders, the applicant shall demonstrate at least twelve
months of stability and not be currently engaged in acute treatment at the time
the application is received.
(4) Has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo
contendere to, a felony. However, the board may, in its discretion, waive this
requirement upon review of the individual's circumstances. Each candidate
shall sign a form prescribed by the board authorizing the board to obtain a
criminal history or to conduct a criminal background check.
(5) Signs a form of professional and ethical accountability and
responsibility as prescribed by the board.
G. The board may prescribe such other qualifications and requirements
for peer support specialist associate as may be appropriate for the protection
of the public or the enhancement of professional services provided pursuant to
the authority of this Chapter.
§3387.17. Peer support specialist supervisor; scope of practice
Page 10 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
A. The legislature finds that peer support is an effective and necessary
component in the continuum of behavioral health treatment and services. In
order to better provide for the health and welfare of the citizens of this state, the
legislature desires to enhance the profession of peer support by providing for
a qualified workforce in sufficient numbers to meet the needs of Louisiana and
to contribute to the development of healthy communities within the state. The
legislature finds peer support supervision to be essential for the ongoing
development of a qualified workforce sufficient to meet the present and
anticipated public health needs of the state.
B. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules which govern peer
support specialist supervisors in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
C. Any person seeking to be recognized by the board as a peer support
specialist supervisor shall submit an application to the board on a form and in
a manner as the board shall prescribe. The initial application form shall be
accompanied by an initial application fee as provided for in this Chapter.
D. Upon investigation of the application, the board shall, within thirty
days, notify each candidate that the application is satisfactory and accepted or
unsatisfactory and rejected. If an application is rejected, the notice shall state
the reason for such rejection.
E. The board shall recognize, as a peer support specialist supervisor,
each candidate who:
(1) Is a legal resident of the United States and at least eighteen years of
age on the date the application is received.
(2) Is not in violation of any ethical standards subscribed to by the board.
(3) If the applicant has lived experience with addiction, mental illness,
or co-occurring disorders, the applicant shall demonstrate at least twelve
months of stability and not be currently engaged in acute treatment at the time
the application is received.
(4) Has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo
Page 11 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
contendere to, a felony. However, the board may, in its discretion, waive this
requirement upon review of the individual's circumstances. Each candidate
shall sign a form prescribed by the board authorizing the board to obtain a
criminal history or to conduct a criminal background check.
(5) Signs a form of professional and ethical accountability and
responsibility as prescribed by the board.
F.(1) Each applicant shall demonstrate professional competence in peer
support supervision by passing a written examination.
(2) The board shall determine the scope and administration of the
examination.
(3) The board may provide for circumstances under which a candidate
who fails the examination, but meets all other requirements, may retake the
examination.
(4) The board shall make reasonable accommodations for those
candidates who demonstrate a special need or disability.
G. A peer support specialist supervisor may provide supervision for any
other peer support specialist or any peer support specialist associate.
* * *
§3388.3. Applicability Peer support specialist renewal
A. It is the intent of the legislature that there be a single authority issuing
credentials for addictive disorder counseling and prevention professionals in
Louisiana. The authority for issuing and recognizing credentials for professionals
engaged in the providing of counseling and prevention services for those who suffer
from addictive disorders shall be the Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority.
Each peer support specialist may renew his status every twelve months.
Each renewal shall be for a twelve-month period.
B. Within the twelve-month period provided for in Subsection A of this
Section, each peer support specialist shall provide to the board documentation
of successfully completing a minimum of twenty board-approved continuing
Page 12 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
educational hours. Such hours shall be directly related to the area of
certification, including six continuing educational hours in ethics.
§3388.4. Peer support specialist associate renewal
A. Each peer support specialist associate may renew his status every
twelve months. Each renewal shall be for a twelve-month period.
B. Within the twelve-month period provided for in Subsection A of this
Section, each peer support specialist associate shall provide to the board
documentation of successfully completing a minimum of twenty
board-approved continuing educational hours. Such hours shall be directly
related to the area of certification, including six continuing educational hours
in ethics.
C. The documentation required by Subsection B of this Section shall be
provided on a form and in a manner prescribed by the board.
D. Failure to renew his status shall disqualify an individual from
reapplying for peer support specialist associate status.
E. Any individual who has maintained peer support specialist associate
status for a consecutive period equal to or less than forty-eight months shall be
allowed to maintain the peer support specialist associate status for a period not
to exceed sixty months.
§3388.5. Peer support specialist supervisor renewal
A. The certification for peer support specialist supervisor shall be
renewed every twenty-four months.
B. Within the twenty-four-month period provided for in Subsection A of
this Section, each peer support supervisor shall provide to the board
documentation of successfully completing a minimum of twenty
board-approved continuing educational hours. Such hours shall be directly
related to the area of certification, including six continuing educational hours
in ethics.
C. The documentation required by Subsection B of this Section shall be
Page 13 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
provided on a form and in a manner prescribed by the board.
D. The board may prescribe such other requirements for renewal as may
be appropriate for the protection of the public or the enhancement of
professional services as provided under the authority of this Chapter.
* * *
§3390.6. Addictive disorders professionals; fees and penalties
* * *
B. The board may impose and collect the following fees:
* * *
(6) Each application for a peer support specialist, associate, and
supervisor shall be accompanied by a fee prescribed by the board. The fee for
processing the application shall be in an amount at least sufficient to cover the
cost of processing the application, but shall not be less than fifty dollars nor
more than three hundred dollars. The fee for administering the written
examination shall be in an amount at least sufficient to cover the cost of
administering the written examination, but shall not be less than one hundred
dollars nor more than three hundred dollars. The renewal fee for a peer support
specialist, associate, or supervisor shall not be less than one hundred dollars nor
more than three hundred dollars.
(6)(7) The board may require that each application or request for a copy of
any roster maintained pursuant to R.S. 37:3386.3(A)(9) be accompanied by a fee of
not less than one hundred dollars nor more than three hundred dollars.
(7)(8) Each training or educational institute, provider, or institution shall pay
a fee of not less than two hundred nor more than two hundred fifty dollars to the
board in order to be authorized to provide approved education, training, and courses.
Such authorization shall be valid for a period of one year. For those education
providers who elect not to seek annual approval, the board is authorized to impose
and collect a fee of not less than one hundred nor more than one hundred fifty dollars
for each course approved. In addition, all providers submitting course reports shall
Page 14 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
pay a fee of not less than one nor more than five dollars per participant.
(8)(9) Any person seeking approval of continuing education credit when
those credits were not approved pursuant to Paragraph (7)(8) of this Subsection, shall
pay a fee of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than fifty dollars for each
fifteen hours of continuing education credit.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1203.3(E)(3)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1203.3. Refusal to hire or contract; termination of employment; exceptions to
hiring prohibition; appeal procedure; waiver
* * *
E.
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall not be
prohibited or disqualified from employment as a peer support specialist with a
licensed behavioral health services provider if the person's criminal background
check reveals he has been convicted of an offense provided for in R.S. 14:38.1 or 67,
or convicted of distribution or possession with the intent to distribute controlled
dangerous substances listed in Schedules I through V of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Law, R.S. 40:961 et seq., if that person meets all of the
following requirements:
* * *
(b) After satisfactorily completing his sentence or after being lawfully
released from confinement, supervision, or probation for his most recent conviction
for an offense listed in this Paragraph, the person successfully completed all training
and requirements established by the office of behavioral health of the department for
a peer support specialist as evidenced by a Notice of Completion of Training and
Requirements issued by the office of behavioral health or its designee Addictive
Disorder Regulatory Authority.
* * *
Page 15 of 16
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-192 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 168
Section 3. R.S. 40:1203.3(E)(5) is hereby repealed.